languages/apertium-mkd/apertium-mkd.mkd.dix
<pardef n="истра/е__vblex"> <!-- perf"/><s n="iv -->
  <e>        <p>          <l>ј</l>          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јте</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>ам</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>јам</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еш</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>е</l>          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еме</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ете</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ат</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>јат</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>ев</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еше</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еше</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>евме</l>       <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>евте</l>       <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еја</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>еа</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>ел</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ела</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ело</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еле</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <!--also with j-->
  <e>        <p>          <l>ав</l>          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>јав</l>          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>а</l>           <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>ја</l>           <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>а</l>           <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>ја</l>           <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>авме</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>јавме</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>авте</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>јавте</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>аа</l>          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>јаа</l>          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>ал</l>          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ала</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ало</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>але</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>ен</l>          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ениот</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ениов</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>енион</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ена</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ената</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>енава</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>енана</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ено</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еното</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еново</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еноно</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ени</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ените</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ениве</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>енине</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

      <e lm="дотрае"><i>дотра</i><par n="истра/е__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="затрае"><i>затра</i><par n="истра/е__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="истрае"><i>истра</i><par n="истра/е__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="потрае"><i>потра</i><par n="истра/е__vblex"/></e>
